Utah statutes.
76-8-404.   Making profit from or misusing public money -- Disqualification from office -- Criminal penalty.

A public officer, regardless of whether or not the officer receives, safekeeps, transfers, disburses, or has a fiduciary relationship with public money, who makes a profit from or out of public money, or who uses public money in a manner or for a purpose not authorized by law, is guilty of a felony as provided in Section 76-8-402 and shall, in addition to the punishment provided by law, be disqualified to hold public office.

